Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2214.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 306.47, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 3. Upon written request by a utility infrastructure owner, the department shall engage in coordination activities with a utility or transmission line developer to review highway corridors identified in the request for potential locations to place transmission lines. The department shall assign a project coordinator within thirty days of receiving the written request. The department shall share all known plans with affected utility or transmission Senate File 2214, p. 2 line developers on planned future projects in the highway corridor if the planned highway project impacts the placement or siting of transmission lines. Sec. 2. Section 306A.3, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2. a. The state department of transportation shall adopt rules , pursuant to chapter 17A , embodying a utility accommodation policy which imposes reasonable restrictions on placements , occurring on or after the effective date of the rules, on primary road rights-of-way. The rules may require utilities to give notice to the department prior to installation of a utility system on a primary road right-of-way and obtain prior permission from the department for the proposed installation. Upon written request by a utility infrastructure owner, longitudinal transmission line installations may be installed on a primary road right-of-way, including on an interstate road right-of-way, unless the department determines such an installation would endanger public safety or interfere with the proper function and public use of the highway. The rules shall must recognize emergency situations and the need for immediate installation of service extensions subject to the standards adopted by the department and the utilities commission. The rules shall not be no less stringent than the standards adopted by the utilities commission pursuant to chapters 478 , 479 , and 479B . This subsection shall not be construed as granting the department authority which has been expressly granted to the utilities commission to determine the route of utility installations. If the department requires a utility company permit, the department shall be required to act upon the permit application within thirty days of its filing. In cases of federal-aid highway projects on nonprimary highways, the local authority with jurisdiction over the highway and the department shall comply with all federal regulations and statutes regarding utility accommodation. b. If the department denies an installation of a longitudinal transmission line on a primary road right-of-way, including on an interstate road right-of-way, the department Senate File 2214, p. 3 shall make the reason for the denial available to the public within ninety days. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2214, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor